Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Family Child Care Homes

§ 43-20-51.
Legislative purpose.

The purpose of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 is to protect and promote the health and safety of children of this state who are cared for in family child care homes which are not required to be licensed by the state, by allowing for a voluntary registration of such homes, establishing of standards for such homes and child care providers and allowing for periodic routine inspection and mandatory inspections when warranted by complaints.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-20-53.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65:

“Family child care home” means any residential facility occupied by the operator where five (5) or fewer children who are not related within the third degree computed according to the civil law to the provider and who are under the age of thirteen (13) years of age are provided care for any part of the 24-hour day.

“Registering agency” means the Mississippi State Department of Health.

“Provider” means the person responsible for the care of children.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 16; Laws, 2000, ch. 415, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-20-55.
Development of regulations and standards; compensation of advisory council members.

The advisory council appointed by the Executive Officer of the State Department of Health under the provisions of Section 43-20-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall assist and advise in the development of regulations and standards governing the registration and regulation of family child care homes. Members of the council who are not public employees shall receive per diem compensation as provided under Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be reimbursed for mileage and expenses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-20-57.
Persons prohibited from working or residing in family child care home; resident with disability counted as child in care; access to records of workers and volunteers in home.

No person shall knowingly maintain a family child care home if, in such family child care home, there resides, works or regularly volunteers any person who:

Has a felony conviction for a crime against persons;

Has a felony conviction under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act;

Has a conviction for a crime of child abuse or neglect;

Has a conviction for any sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

Any other offense committed in another jurisdiction or any federal offense which, if committed in this state, would be deemed to be such a crime without regard to its designation elsewhere;

Has been adjudicated a juvenile offender because of having committed an act which if done by an adult would constitute the commission of a felony and which is a crime against persons;

Has had a child declared in a court order in this or any other state to be deprived or a child in need of care based on an allegation of physical, mental or emotional abuse or neglect or sexual abuse;

Has had parental rights terminated pursuant to Section 93-15-101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972; or

Has an infectious or contagious disease, as defined by the State Department of Health pursuant to Section 41-23-1, Mississippi Code of 1972.

No person shall maintain a family child care home if such person has been found to be a disabled person in need of a guardian or conservator, or both.

Any person who resides in the home and who has been found to be a disabled person in need of a guardian or conservator, or both, shall be included in the total number of children allowed in care.

In accordance with the provision of this subsection (4), the State Department of Health shall have access to any court orders or adjudications of any court of record, any records of such orders or adjudications, criminal history record information in the possession of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol or court of this state concerning persons working, regularly volunteering or residing in a family child care home. The department shall have access to these records for the purpose of determining whether or not the home meets the requirements of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65.

No family child care home or its employees shall be liable for civil damages to any person refused employment or discharged from employment by reason of such home’s compliance with the provisions of this section if such home acts in good faith to comply with this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 18; Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-20-59.
Registration [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Any person maintaining a family child care home may register such home with the State Department of Health on forms provided by the department.

A certificate of registration shall be issued to the applicant for registration who (a) attests to the safety of the home for the care of children, (b) submits a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00), payable to the department, and (c) certifies that no person described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d) or (e) of Section 43-20-57(1) resides, works or volunteers in the family child care home.

Any increase in the fee charged by the department under this subsection shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65.

The department shall furnish each applicant for registration a family child care home safety evaluation form to be completed by the applicant and submitted with the registration application.

The certificate of registration shall be renewed annually in the same manner provided for in this section.

A certificate of registration shall be in force for one (1) year after the date of issuance unless revoked pursuant to Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65. The certificate shall specify that the registrant may operate a family child care home for five (5) or fewer children. This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the department to enter a registered family child care home for the purpose of assessing compliance with Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 after receiving a complaint against the registrant of such home or in conducting a periodic routine inspection.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the registration provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 19; Laws, 2016, ch. 510, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-20-61.
Denial, revocation, or refusal to renew certificate of registration; hearing.

The department may deny, revoke or refuse to renew a certificate of registration upon determination that the registrant falsified information on the application or willfully and substantially has violated Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65, inclusive and amendments thereto. The department shall not revoke or refuse to renew any certificate without giving notice and conducting a hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-20-63.
Suspension of certificate of registration; grounds.

The department may suspend any certificate of registration issued under the provision of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 upon any of the following grounds and in the manner provided in Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65:

Violation by the registrant of any provision of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 or of the rules and regulations promulgated under Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65;

Aiding, abetting or permitting the violation of any provision of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 or of the rules and regulations promulgated under Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65;

Conduct in the operation or maintenance, or both the operation and maintenance of a family child care home which is inimical to health, morals, welfare or safety of either an individual in or receiving services from the home or the people of this state; and

The conviction of a registrant at any time during registration of any crime under state or federal law.

The department may suspend any certificate of registration issued under the provisions of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 prior to any hearing when, in the opinion of the department, the action is necessary to protect any child in the family child care home from physical or mental abuse, abandonment or any other substantial threat to health or safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 43-20-65.
Information confidential; hearings may be closed.

Information received by the licensing agency through filed reports, inspections or otherwise authorized under Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65 shall not be disclosed publicly in such manner as to identify individuals. In any hearings conducted under regulation provisions of Sections 43-20-51 through 43-20-65, the hearing officer may close the hearing to the public to prevent public disclosure of matters relating to individuals restricted by other law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 552, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1990.